Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.535.060

Exchange of warrants for bonds.

If bonds issued under this chapter are not sold as herein provided, the owners of unpaid warrants drawn on the county treasurer by such district for an indebtedness existing at the time of the adoption of the resolution mentioned in RCW 28A.535.020, may exchange said warrants at the face value thereof and accrued interest thereon for bonds issued under this chapter, at not less than par value and accrued interest of such bonds at the time of the exchange; such exchange to be made under such regulations as may be provided by the board of directors of such district.

[ 1990 c 33 s 483; 1983 c 167 s 30; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.52.060. Prior: 1909 c 97 p 334 s 7; RRS s 4962; prior: 1897 c 118 s 134; 1895 c 21 s 7. Formerly RCW 28A.52.060, 28.52.060.]

NOTES:

Liberal construction—Severability—1983 c 167: See RCW 39.46.010 and note following.